Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
321C]

OFFICE OF
LANGUAGE ACCESS

Section

321C-1 General purpose; purpose of the office of
language

access

321C-2 Definitions

321C-3 Oral and written language services

321C-4 Additional obligations

321C-5 Public meetings and public hearings

321C-6 Office of language access; established

321C-7 Language access advisory council

Note

Former language access provisions, §§371-31 to 371-37, were
repealed by L 2012, c 201, §3.

Multilingual website pilot project (ends June 30, 2017);
report to 2017 legislature. L 2013, c 217, §2.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next